New Jersey, session 222, A4418.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Education Investment Act. 2.    a.  The Commission on Higher Education shall select one or more public institutions of higher education to participate in an equity financing for education program.  The purpose of the program shall be to provide a student enrolled in an undergraduate or graduate course of study at a participating institution of higher education with an income-contingent option for financing his education. Under the program, a student may defer payment of all or a portion of undergraduate or graduate tuition costs and other expenses covered by the program until the completion of his education.  At some time following the completion of his education, the student shall pay a fixed percentage of his income to the participating institution over a fixed number of years.  The full payment by the student may be more, less, or the same as the deferred expenses he incurred during his education. b.    A participating institution shall permit any student enrolled in an undergraduate or graduate course of study to apply for a deferment and repayment contract through the equity financing for education program.  The participating institution may limit enrollment in the program, consistent with prudent management of the programs costs. c.     The participating institution shall establish the terms and  conditions of the deferment and repayment contract.  The contents of the contract may be established with any third party investors and shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (1)   the percentage of a participating students future income that shall be collected as repayment for his undergraduate or graduate expenses covered by the program; (2)   the length of the repayment period; (3)   the terms and conditions under which the students payments may be temporarily deferred, permanently cancelled, or repaid in a lump sum; (4)   a description of the reporting and repayment procedure; and (5)   provisions for late payment charges and for default. d.    A participating institution shall bear the costs of the equity financing for education program during the deferment period.  The institution may enter into an agreement or contract with one or more third party investors to cover such costs in exchange for a share of future repayments received through the program. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.